Colorado, session 2026A, HB1166.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the department of public safety
for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of Colorado
2025, section 2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part XVIII as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
PART XVIII
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY
(1) EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S OFFICE
(A) Administration
Personal Services 15,024,272 3,246,889 865,818a 10,911,565b
(32.0 FTE) (18.1 FTE) (93.7 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 34,451,952 11,493,080 19,435,864c 3,103,299d 419,709(I)
35,280,999 11,610,952 20,047,230c 3,201,324d 421,493(I)
Short-term Disability 152,643 53,849 83,204c 13,820d 1,770(I)
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 981,294 346,175 534,882c 88,844d 11,393(I)
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Payments 21,806,493 7,692,732 11,886,261c 1,974,317d 253,183(I)
Salary Survey 7,522,369 2,260,923 4,562,191c 625,516d 73,739(I)
Step Pay 534,990 206,051 253,056c 72,831d 3,052(I)
PERA Direct Distribution 4,279,995 1,562,075 2,328,954c 388,966d
Shift Differential 1,337,423 301,851 975,345c 60,227d
Workers' Compensation 1,940,457 1,940,457d
Operating Expenses 647,252 135 647,117d
Legal Services 1,322,245 1,322,245d
Payment to Risk
Management and Property
Funds 7,307,252 2,724,777 4,582,475d
Vehicle Lease Payments 14,780,461 3,385,574 10,010,160c 1,106,967d 277,760(I)
14,289,480 3,116,410 9,939,294c 1,138,141d 95,635(I)
Leased Space 5,633,215 3,088,213 2,004,703c 540,299d
Capitol Complex Leased
Space 2,441,045 1,072,166 804,336c 564,543d
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1166

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Annual Depreciation -
Lease Equivalent Payment 67,700 67,700c
Payments to OIT 21,273,469 11,345,764 503,890c 9,423,815d
20,020,616 10,677,580 389,934c 8,953,102d
CORE Operations 84,405 84,405d
Digital Trunk Radio
Payments 2,081,755 401,351 1,489,651c 136,728d 54,025(I)
Lease Purchase Payments 1,564,133 1,564,133
Utilities 479,987 13,468 464,802c 1,717d
Distributions to Local
Government 50,000 50,000e
145,764,807
144,850,020
a Of these amounts, an estimated $577,212(I) shall be from the Disaster Emergency Fund created in Section 24-33.5-706 (2)(a), C.R.S. and an estimated $288,606(I) shall be from
Wildland Fire Cost Recovery Fund created in Section 24-33.5-1220 (4)(a), C.R.S.. The amounts from the Disaster Emergency Fund and the Wildland Fire Cost Recovery Fund are shown
for informational purposes only as they are continuously appropriated in the referenced statutory provisions.
b Of this amount, $9,345,708 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S., and $1,440,860
shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S., and $124,997 shall be from the Public Safety
Communications Revolving Fund created in 24-33.5-2502 (2)(a), C.R.S.
c Of these amounts, $48,080,430 $48,525,535 shall be from the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 43-4-201 (1)(a), C.R.S., and appropriated pursuant to Section 43-4-201
(3)(a)(I)(C), C.R.S., $1,232,711 $1,234,662 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and $6,091,858 $6,071,346 shall be from various
sources of cash funds.
d Of these amounts, $21,866,262 $21,441,621 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S.
and $4,812,326 $4,895,453 shall be from various sources of reappropriated funds.
e This amount shall be from the Hazardous Materials Safety Fund created in Section 42-20-107 (1), C.R.S.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1166

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(B) Special Programs
(1) Witness Protection Program
Witness Protection Fund 50,000 50,000
Witness Protection Fund
Expenditures 83,000 83,000a
133,000
a This amount shall be from the Witness Protection Fund created in Section 24-33.5-106 (6), C.R.S.
(2) Colorado Integrated Criminal Justice Information System (CICJIS)
Personal Services 1,341,789 58,273 1,038,988a 244,528(I)
(11.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 207,002 56,500 100,502a 50,000(I)
1,548,791
a These amounts shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S.
(3) Office of School Safety
Administrative Services 5,697,646 447,646 5,250,000a
(2.0 FTE)
School Safety Resource
Center 1,881,690 1,735,199 146,491a
(11.5 FTE)
School Security
Disbursement Program -
Proposition KK97a 1,000,000 1,000,000b
Crisis Response Unit 885,725 885,725
(4.0 FTE)
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1166

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Threat Assessment 203,415 203,415
(0.5 FTE)
9,668,476
a Of these amounts, $5,000,000 shall be from the School Access for Emergency Response Grant Program Cash Fund created in Section 24-33.5-2107 (1)(a), C.R.S., $250,000 shall
be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and $146,491 shall be from the School Safety Resource Center Cash Fund created in Section
24-33.5-1807 (1), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the School Security Disbursement Fund created in Section 24-33.5-1811 (1), C.R.S.
157,115,074
156,200,287
(2) COLORADO STATE PATROL
Colonel, Lt. Colonels,
Majors, and Captains 7,073,684 192,077 6,881,607a
(1.0 FTE) (33.0 FTE)
Sergeants, Technicians, and
Troopers 96,456,520 1,880,656 91,685,952b 2,889,912c
(18.0 FTE) (628.0 FTE) (21.6 FTE)
Civilians 6,168,582 119,907 5,958,091b 90,584c
(1.0 FTE) (81.0 FTE) (1.0 FTE)
Retirements 400,000 400,000a
Overtime 2,537,714 2,503,384b 34,330c
Operating Expenses 13,205,448 539,124 12,417,003b 249,321c
Information Technology
Asset Maintenance 2,986,020 2,986,020a
Ports of Entry 10,624,493 10,624,493d
(117.8 FTE)
Communications Program 13,805,274 13,687,442d 107,885e 9,947(I)
(131.0 FTE) (9.1 FTE)
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1166

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
State Patrol Training
Academy 4,740,406 253,186 3,943,304f 543,916g
(2.0 FTE) (17.0 FTE)
Safety and Law
Enforcement Support 3,978,340 1,410,913h 2,567,427g
(2.0 FTE)
Aircraft Program 835,124 643,774i 191,350g
(4.5 FTE) (1.5 FTE)
Executive and Capitol
Complex Security Program 11,656,769 9,523,500 2,133,269g
(82.0 FTE) (26.0 FTE)
Hazardous Materials Safety
Program 3,365,238 3,365,238j
(12.0 FTE)
Automobile Theft
Prevention Authority 14,410,479 7,651,632 6,758,847k
(9.0 FTE)
Victim Assistance 767,471 257,490l 331,922m 178,059(I)
(5.0 FTE) (1.8 FTE)
Counter-drug Program 4,000,000 4,000,000(I)n
Motor Carrier Safety and
Assistance Program Grants 4,926,984 999,910a 3,927,074(I)
(32.0 FTE)
Federal Safety Grants 1,598,411 1,598,411(I)
(2.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 26,748,093 24,483,189o 1,253,644e 1,011,260(I)
230,285,050
a These amounts shall be from the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 43-4-201 (1)(a), C.R.S., and appropriated pursuant to Section 43-4-201 (3)(a)(I)(C), C.R.S.
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1166

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
b Of these amounts, $108,712,312 shall be from the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 43-4-201 (1)(a), C.R.S., and appropriated pursuant to Section 43-4-201 (3)(a)(I)(C),
C.R.S., $1,873,039 shall be from the E-470 Toll Road Authority, $551,713 shall be from the Vehicle Identification Number Inspection Fund created in Section 42-5-204 (2)(a), C.R.S.,
and $1,427,366 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
c These amounts shall be from Limited Gaming funds appropriated to the Department of Revenue.
d Of these amounts, $23,302,932 shall be from the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 43-4-201 (1)(a), C.R.S., and appropriated pursuant to Section 43-4-201 (3)(a)(I)(C), C.R.S.,
$212,306 shall be from the Hazardous Materials Safety Fund created in Section 42-20-107 (1), C.R.S., and $796,697 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
e These amounts shall be from various sources of reappropriated funds.
f Of this amount, an estimated $3,504,819 shall be from the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 43-4-201 (1)(a), C.R.S., and appropriated pursuant to Section 43-4-201 (3)(a)
(I)(C), C.R.S., an estimated $150,000 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $79,844 shall be from user fees collected from
non-state agencies, and an estimated $208,641 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
g These amounts shall be from user fees collected from other state agencies, including the Judicial Branch, Legislative Branch, and the Department of Personnel.
h This amount shall be from various cash funds.
i Of this amount, an estimated $447,281 shall be from the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 43-4-201 (1)(a), C.R.S., and appropriated pursuant to Section 43-4-201 (3)(a)(I)(C),
C.R.S., an estimated $180,000 shall be from the Aircraft Engine Fund, a Department internal services fund, and an estimated $16,493 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
j Of this amount, $2,709,158 shall be from the Hazardous Materials Safety Fund created in Section 42-20-107 (1), C.R.S., $426,783 shall be from the Highway Users Tax Fund created
in Section 43-4-201 (1)(a), C.R.S., and appropriated pursuant to Section 43-4-201 (3)(a)(I)(C), C.R.S., and $229,297 shall be from the Nuclear Materials Transportation Fund created
in Section 42-20-511, C.R.S.
k Of this amount, $6,213,420 shall be from the Colorado Auto Theft Prevention Cash Fund created in Section 42-5-112 (4)(a), C.R.S., and $545,427 shall be from the Highway Users
Tax Fund created in Section 43-4-201(1)(a), C.R.S.
l This amount shall be from compulsory insurance fine revenue collected and allocated pursuant to Section 42-4-1409 (9), C.R.S.
m This amount shall be transferred from the Division of Criminal Justice, Victims Assistance Sub-program.
n This amount shall be from local governments for the purchase of counter-drug equipment from the federal government pursuant to Title 10, Chapter 15, Section 281 U.S.C.
o Of this amount, $24,053,136 shall be from the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 43-4-201 (1)(a), C.R.S., and appropriated pursuant to Section 43-4-201 (3)(a)(I)(C), C.R.S.,
$316,348 shall be from the E-470 Toll Road Authority, $62,186 shall be from the Vehicle Identification Number Inspection Fund created in Section 42-5-204 (2)(a), C.R.S., and $51,519
shall be from various sources of cash funds.
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1166

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(3) DIVISION OF FIRE PREVENTION AND CONTROL
Personal Services 7,723,650 1,735,642 4,154,554a 1,833,454b
7,755,415 4,186,319a
(77.6 FTE)
(77.9 FTE)
Operating Expenses 2,022,180 411,802 879,902a 655,379b 75,097(I)
2,048,487 906,209a
Overtime 141,523 113,238a 28,285b
Appropriation to the
Wildfire Preparedness Fund 4,150,000 4,150,000
Wildland Fire Management
Services 33,465,127 24,309,849 4,938,474(I)c 3,972,420(I)d 244,384(I)
(94.9 FTE) (37.6 FTE) (4.1 FTE)
Fire Investigation
Reimbursements 575,900 575,900b
Wildfire Resiliency Code
Board 235,403 235,403b
(2.0 FTE)
WILDFIRE RESILIENCY
CODE ENFORCEMENT 155,134 52,255g 102,879b
(1.0 FTE)
Appropriation to the
Wildfire Resiliency Code
Board Cash Fund 338,282 338,282
Appropriation to the Local
Firefighter Safety and
Disease Prevention Fund 500,000 500,000
Appropriation to the
Wildfire Emergency
Response Fund 1,706,926 1,706,926
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1166

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Appropriation to Fire
Investigation Cash Fund 2,349,937 2,349,937
Aviation Resources98 7,342,500 7,342,500
Indirect Cost Assessment 682,279 586,544e 95,735f
61,233,707
61,446,913
a Of these amounts, an estimated $1,831,862 $1,889,934 shall be from the Public School Construction and Inspection Cash Fund created in Section 24-33.5-1207.7, C.R.S., an estimated
$1,008,940 shall be from the Health Facility Construction and Inspection Cash Fund created in Section 24-33.5-1207.8, C.R.S., an estimated $202,300 shall be from the Firefighter,
Hazardous Materials Responder, and Prescribed Fire Training and Certification Fund created in Section 24-33.5-1207 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $193,000 shall be from the Fire
Suppression Cash Fund created in Section 24-33.5-1207.6 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $44,300 shall be from the Fire Service Education and Training Fund created in Section 24-33.5-1207.5
(1), C.R.S., and an estimated $1,867,292 shall be from various cash funds including: the Firefighter, Hazardous Materials Responder, and Prescribed Fire Training and Certification Fund
created in Section 24-33.5-1207 (1), C.R.S.; the Fire Suppression Cash Fund created in Section 24-33.5-1207.6 (1), C.R.S.; the Fireworks Licensing Cash Fund created in Section
24-33.5-2004 (6)(b), C.R.S.; the Fire Service Education and Training Fund created in Section 24-33.5-1207.5 (1), C.R.S.; the Health Facility Construction and Inspection Cash Fund
created in Section 24-33.5-1207.8, C.R.S.; the Public School Construction and Inspection Cash Fund created in Section 24-33.5-1207.7, C.R.S.; the Wildland-urban Interface Training
Fund created in Section 24-33.5-1212 (5)(a)(I), C.R.S.; the Wildfire Resiliency Code Board Cash Fund created in Section 24-33.5-1236 (8)(a), C.R.S.; and from various sources of cash
funds including gifts and grants.
b Of these amounts, $2,240,580 shall be from the Fire Investigation Fund created in Section 24-33.5-1238 (1), C.R.S., $623,269 shall be from appropriations to the Health Facilities and
Emergency Medical Services Division in the Department of Public Health and Environment, $235,403 $338,282 shall be from the Wildfire Resiliency Code Board Cash Fund created
in Section 24-33.5-1236 (8)(a), C.R.S., $175,106 shall be from Limited Gaming funds appropriated to the Department of Revenue, and $54,063 shall be from various sources of
reappropriated funds including the Waste Tire Administration, Enforcement, Market Development, and Cleanup Fund created in Section 30-20-1404 (1), C.R.S.
c Of this amount, $1,950,000 shall be from the Wildfire Emergency Response Fund created in Section 24-33.5-1226 (1)(a), C.R.S., $1,673,886 shall be from the Colorado Firefighting
Air Corps Fund created in Section 24-33.5-1228 (3)(a), C.R.S., $1,000,000 shall be from the Emergency Fire Fund created in Section 24-33.5-1220 (2)(a), C.R.S., $296,584 shall be
from the Wildland Fire Equipment Repair Cash Fund created in Section 24-33.5-1220 (3), C.R.S., and $18,004 shall be from the Wildland Fire Cost Recovery Fund created in Section
24-33.5-1220 (4)(a), C.R.S. These amounts are shown for informational purposes only as they are continuously appropriated in the referenced statutory provisions.
d This amount shall be from the Wildfire Preparedness Fund created in Section 24-33.5-1227 (1)(a), C.R.S.
e This amount shall be from various cash funds.
f This amount shall be from various sources of reappropriated funds.
g THIS AMOUNT SHALL BE FROM THE WILDFIRE RESILIENCY CODE BOARD CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 24-33.5-1236 (8)(a), C.R.S.
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1166

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(4) DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE
(A) Administration
DCJ Administrative
Services 7,520,834 5,889,136 889,975a 607,061b 134,662(I)
(49.5 FTE) (8.7 FTE) (1.9 FTE) (1.3 FTE)
Multidisciplinary Crime
Prevention and Crisis
Intervention Grant
Program 4,992,055 4,992,055a
Law Enforcement
Workforce Recruitment,
Retention, and Tuition
Grant Program 3,593,030 3,593,030a
SMART Policing Grant
Program 7,031,919 7,031,919a
Appropriation to the Jail
Standards Advisory
Committee Cash Fund 610,000 305,000 305,000b
First Responder Employer
Health Benefit Trusts 250,000 250,000
Indirect Cost Assessment 700,386 128,182c 572,204(I)
24,698,224
a Of these amounts, $7,031,919 shall be from the SMART Policing Grant Fund created in Section 24-33.5-529 (4)(a), C.R.S., $4,992,055 shall be from the Multidisciplinary Crime
Prevention and Crisis Intervention Grant Fund created in Section 24-33.5-527 (4)(a), C.R.S., $3,593,030 shall be from the Law Enforcement Workforce Recruitment, Retention, and
Tuition Grant Fund created in Section 24-33.5-528 (4)(a), C.R.S., $661,636 shall be from the Victims Assistance and Law Enforcement (VALE) Fund created in Section 24-33.5-506
(1), C.R.S., $211,918 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and $16,421 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b Of these amounts, $469,472 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S., $305,000 shall
be from the Jail Standards Advisory Committee Cash Fund created in Section 30-10-530 (7)(a), C.R.S., and $137,589 shall be transferred from the Judicial Department from the
Correctional Treatment Cash Fund Expenditures line item appropriation in the Probation and Related Services section.
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1166

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
c Of this amount, $81,519 shall be from the Victims Assistance and Law Enforcement (VALE) Fund created in Section 24-33.5-506 (1), C.R.S., $38,011 shall be from the
Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and $8,652 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
(B) Victims Assistance
Federal Victims Assistance
and Compensation Grants 25,344,672 25,344,672(I)
(8.6 FTE)
State Victims Assistance
and Law Enforcement
Program 1,500,000 1,500,000a
Child Abuse Investigation 1,597,693 1,300,000 297,693b
(0.3 FTE)
Colorado Crime Victim
Services - Proposition
KK97a 30,000,000 30,000,000c
Colorado Crime Victim
Services - Prior General
Fund Appropriations 7,566,671 7,566,671c
Sexual Assault Victim
Emergency Payment
Program 167,933 167,933
(0.2 FTE)
Statewide Victim
Information and
Notification System
(VINE) 492,800 492,800
66,669,769
a This amount shall be from the Victims Assistance and Law Enforcement (VALE) Fund created in Section 24-33.5-506 (1), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Child Abuse Investigation Surcharge Fund created in Section 18-24-103 (2)(a), C.R.S.
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1166

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
c These amounts shall be from the Colorado Crime Victim Services Fund created in Section 24-33.5-505.5 (2)(a), C.R.S.
(C) Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention
Juvenile Justice
Disbursements 800,000 800,000(I)
(1.2 FTE)
Juvenile Diversion
Programs 3,561,677 3,161,677 400,000a
(2.7 FTE) (0.3 FTE)
4,361,677
a This amount shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
(D) Community Corrections
Community Corrections
Placements99 79,364,508 79,364,508
81,246,158 81,246,158
Correctional Treatment
Cash Fund Residential
Placements100 3,888,613 3,888,613a
Community Corrections
Facility Payments 2,923,297 2,923,297
Community Corrections
Boards Administration 2,769,066 2,769,066
Services for Substance
Abuse and Co-occurring
Disorders 2,776,237 2,776,237a
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1166

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Specialized Offender
Services 214,483 214,483
91,936,204
93,817,854
a These amounts shall be transferred from the Judicial Department from the Correctional Treatment Cash Fund Expenditures line item appropriation in the Probation and Related Services
section.
(E) Crime Control and System Improvement
State and Local Crime
Control and System
Improvement Grants 3,000,000 3,000,000(I)
Sex Offender Surcharge
Fund Program 453,137 89,918 363,219a
(0.9 FTE) (1.5 FTE)
Sex Offender Supervision 607,907 607,907
(5.2 FTE)
Treatment Provider
Criminal Background
Checks 49,606 49,606b
(0.6 FTE)
Federal Grants 5,008,909 5,008,909(I)
(10.5 FTE)
Criminal Justice Training 240,000 240,000c
(0.5 FTE)
$9,359,559
a This amount shall be from the Sex Offender Surcharge Fund created in Section 18-21-103 (3), C.R.S.
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1166

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
b Of this amount, $29,744 shall be from the Domestic Violence Offender Treatment Provider Fund created in Section 16-11.8-104 (2)(b), C.R.S., and $19,862 shall be from the Sex
Offender Treatment Provider Fund created in Section 16-11.7-106 (6), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the Criminal Justice Training Fund created in Section 24-33.5-503.5 (2), C.R.S.
197,025,433
198,907,083
(5) COLORADO BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION
(A) Administration
Personal Services 942,941 852,885 90,056a
(9.2 FTE) (0.8 FTE)
Operating Expenses 45,584 34,749 10,835a
Federal Grants 968,444 968,444(I)
(3.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 2,143,825 1,808,226b 77,821c 257,778(I)
4,100,794
a These amounts shall be from the Colorado Bureau of Investigation Identification Unit Fund created in Section 24-33.5-426, C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from various sources of cash funds, including an estimated $441,990 from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from various sources of reappropriated funds.
(B) Colorado Crime Information Center (CCIC)
(1) CCIC Program Support
Personal Services 1,323,751 1,191,892 121,000a 10,859b
(13.8 FTE) (2.2 FTE) (0.2 FTE)
Operating Expenses 197,917 117,104 60,880c 19,933d
Recovery Program for
Persons Who Wander 189,141 100,000 89,141b
1,710,809
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1166

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of this amount, an estimated $67,315 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and an estimated $53,685 shall be from the Sex Offender
Registry Fund created in Section 16-22-110 (7), C.R.S.
b These amounts shall be from the $100,000 General Fund included in the program appropriation and transferred into the Recovery Program for Persons Who Wander Cash Fund created
in Section 24-33.5-415.9 (6), C.R.S.
c Of this amount, $39,451 shall be from the Colorado Bureau of Investigation Identification Unit Fund created in Section 24-33.5-426, C.R.S., $14,653 shall be from the Marijuana Tax
Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and $6,776 shall be from the Sex Offender Registry Fund created in Section 16-22-110 (7), C.R.S.
d This amount shall be from the Colorado Bureau of Investigation Identification Unit Fund created in Section 24-33.5-426, C.R.S., from fees collected from other state agencies.
(2) Biometric Identification
and Records Unit
Personal Services 6,270,371 1,975,810 3,890,646a 403,915b
(24.3 FTE) (56.2 FTE) (5.6 FTE)
Operating Expenses 6,239,886 247,680 3,446,828a 2,545,378b
Lease/Lease Purchase
Equipment 591,235 378,392a 212,843b
13,101,492
a These amounts shall be from the Colorado Bureau of Investigation Identification Unit Fund created in Section 24-33.5-426, C.R.S., from fingerprint and name check processing fees
collected from non-state agencies.
b Of these amounts, $2,876,465 shall be from the Colorado Bureau of Investigation Identification Unit Fund created in Section 24-33.5-426, C.R.S., from fingerprint and name check
processing fees collected from other state agencies, and $285,671 shall be transferred from the Marijuana Enforcement line item in the Department of Revenue from the Marijuana Cash
Fund created in Section 44-10-801 (1)(a), C.R.S.
(3) Information
Technology 1,602,897 844,310 758,587a
a This amount shall be from various sources of cash funds, including the Colorado Bureau of Investigation Identification Unit Fund created in Section 24-33.5-426, C.R.S., and the Sex
Offender Registry Fund created in Section 16-22-110 (7), C.R.S.
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1166

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(C) Laboratory and Investigative Services
CBI Laboratory Services 21,581,340 17,329,882 4,233,130a 18,328b
(139.1 FTE)
CBI Investigative Services 18,970,892 17,182,110 1,768,782c 20,000d
(154.7 FTE)
Overtime 829,487 761,252 68,235c
Complex Financial Fraud
Unit 653,345 653,345e
(7.0 FTE)
Lease/Lease Purchase
Equipment 439,196 439,196
42,474,260
a Of this amount, $2,732,971 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., $1,200,159 shall be from the Offender Identification Fund created
in Section 24-33.5-415.6 (1), C.R.S., and $300,000 shall be from the Law Enforcement Assistance Fund created in Section 43-4-401, C.R.S.
b This amount shall be transferred from the Division of Criminal Justice, Victims Assistance Sub-program.
c These amounts shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
d This amount shall be transferred from the Colorado Bureau of Investigation Grants and Donation Fund created in Section 24-33.5-427, C.R.S.
e This amount shall be from the Colorado Identity Theft and Financial Fraud Cash Fund created in Section 24-33.5-1707 (1)(a), C.R.S.
(D) State Point of Contact - National Instant Criminal Background Check Program
Personal Services 4,727,081 4,727,081a
(71.7 FTE)
Operating Expenses 424,109 424,109a
5,151,190
a Of these amounts, $4,689,510 shall be from the Instant Criminal Background Check Cash Fund created in Section 24-33.5-424 (3.5)(b), C.R.S., and $461,680 shall be from permit
application fees collected pursuant to Section 18-12-205 (2)(b), C.R.S.
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1166

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
68,141,442
(6) DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT
(A) Office of Emergency Management
Program Administration 7,389,535 5,661,214 65,841a 1,662,480(I)
7,725,244 401,550a
(42.0 FTE) (1.0 FTE) (17.6 FTE)
Appropriation to the
Emergency Stockpile
Rotation Cash Fund 1,630,403 1,630,403
Disaster Response and
Recovery 3,998,372 3,548,372(I)b 450,000(I)
(18.0 FTE)
Preparedness Grants and
Training 11,347,034 11,347,034(I)
(1.6 FTE)
Access and Functional
Needs Planning 500,000 500,000
Indirect Cost Assessment 1,706,818 16,301c 1,170,718d 519,799(I)
26,572,162
26,907,871
a This amount OF THIS AMOUNT, $335,709 SHALL BE FROM THE PUBLIC SAFETY COMMUNICATIONS REVOLVING FUND CREATED IN SECTION 24-33.5-2502 (2)(a), C.R.S., AND $65,841
shall be transferred from the Division of Local Government in the Department of Local Affairs.
b This amount shall be from the Disaster Emergency Fund created in Section 24-33.5-706 (2)(a), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
d This amount shall be from the Public Safety Communications Revolving Fund created in Section 24-33.5-2502 (2)(a), C.R.S.
PAGE 17-HOUSE BILL 26-1166

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(B) Office of Prevention and Security
Personal Services 2,297,108 1,477,727 89,699a 729,682(I)
(17.4 FTE) (1.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 812,477 315,672 5,653a 491,152(I)
Extreme Risk Protection
Order Hotline 257,242 257,242
(3.0 FTE)
Safe2Tell Dispatch 653,757 653,757
(8.0 FTE)
4,020,584
a These amounts shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
(C) Office of Preparedness
Program Administration 1,882,043 1,580,877 301,166(I)
(13.7 FTE)
Grants and Training 9,609,527 9,609,527(I)
State Facility Security 35,000 35,000
Nonprofit Security Grant
Program101 813,182 813,182
Preventing Identity-based
Violence Grant Program101 500,000 500,000
12,839,752
(D) Office of Public Safety Communications
Program Administration 7,340,351 7,340,351a
7,965,327 7,965,327a
(49.5 FTE)
DTRS Equipment Costs 3,000,000 3,000,000(I)b
PAGE 18-HOUSE BILL 26-1166

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
DTRS Vendor Contract 12,000,000 12,000,000(I)b
22,340,351
22,965,327
a This amount shall be from revenue collected from Digital Trunk Radio Payments from state agencies deposited in the Public Safety Communications Revolving Fund created in Section
24-33.5-2502 (2)(a), C.R.S.
b These amounts shall be from transfers from the Local Government Severance Tax Fund into the Public Safety Communications Trust Fund created in Section 24-33.5-2510 (1), C.R.S.,
pursuant to Sections 39-29-110 (10)(a) and 24-33.5-2510 (3)(a)(IV), C.R.S. The Public Safety Communications Trust Fund is continuously appropriated pursuant to Section 24-33.5-2510
(1), C.R.S., and is included for informational purposes only.
65,772,849
66,733,534
TOTALS PART XVIII
(PUBLIC SAFETY) $779,573,555 $269,238,653 $349,549,184a $91,154,818b $69,630,900c
$781,714,309 $270,300,827 $350,086,055a $91,876,868b $69,450,559c
a Of this amount, $220,340,657 $220,785,762 is from the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 43-4-201 (1)(a), C.R.S., and appropriated pursuant to Section 43-4-201 (3)(a)(I)(C),
C.R.S., and $13,352,664 contains an (I) notation.
b Of this amount, $18,972,420 contains an (I) notation.
c This amount contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
97a Department of Public Safety, Executive Director's Office, Special Programs, School Security Disbursement Program - Proposition KK; Division of Criminal
Justice, Victims Assistance, Colorado Crime Victim Services - Proposition KK -- These appropriations remain available for expenditure until the close of
the 2026-27 state fiscal year.
98 Department of Public Safety, Division of Fire Prevention and Control, Aviation Resources -- This appropriation remains available for expenditure until the
PAGE 19-HOUSE BILL 26-1166

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
close of the 2026-27 state fiscal year.
99 Department of Public Safety, Division of Criminal Justice, Community Corrections, Community Corrections Placements -- This appropriation assumes the
daily rates and average daily populations listed in the following table. It is the General Assembly's intent that the daily rates shown in the table be the default
rates and that the Division adjust these rates on an as-needed basis. The appropriation assumes that offenders will not be charged a daily subsistence fee. The
base rate for standard nonresidential services assumes a weighted average of the rates for four different levels of service. This appropriation also assumes that
the residential base per-diem rate in the table included in this footnote will be increased by 1.0 percent for programs meeting recidivism performance targets
and 1.0 percent for programs meeting program completion performance targets. THE RATES SHOWN IN THE TABLE BELOW SHALL BE INCREASED BY 3.3 PERCENT
FROM MARCH 1, 2026 TO JUNE 30, 2026.
Average Daily
Rate type Rate Placements Appropriation
Residential base rate $70.39 959 $24,649,496
Base rate plus 1.0% incentive $71.09 783 $20,317,167
Base rate plus 2.0% incentive $71.80 875 $22,931,125
Specialized Differentials
Intensive Residential Treatment $63.61 206 $4,782,836
Residential Dual Diagnosis Treatment $63.61 90 $2,089,589
Sex Offender $34.68 116 $1,468,351
Standard Non-residential $9.94 792 $2,873,455
Outpatient Therapeutic Community $27.67 25 $252,489
$79,364,508
Total $81,246,158
100 Department of Public Safety, Division of Criminal Justice, Community Corrections, Correctional Treatment Cash Fund Residential Placements -- This
appropriation includes funding for condition-of-probation placements at rates corresponding to those in footnote 99.
PAGE 20-HOUSE BILL 26-1166

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
101 Department of Public Safety, Division of Homeland Security and Emergency Management, Office of Preparedness, Nonprofit Security Grant Program;
Preventing Identity-based Violence Grant Program Resources -- This appropriation remains available for expenditure until the close of the 2026-27 state fiscal
year.
PAGE 21-HOUSE BILL 26-1166

SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 22-HOUSE BILL 26-1166